Washington statutes.
RCW 2.50.090

Registration fees and private funds.

For the purpose of promoting organized legal aid, the bar board is empowered to receive and disburse, at its discretion, a nominal registration fee (not in excess of fifty cents), which it may require of legal aid applicants, and also donations in any sum of private funds.

[ 1939 c 93 s 9; RRS s 10007-209. Formerly RCW 74.36.090.]